Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
323F

HAWAII
HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION

Part I. General Provisions

Section

323F-1 Definitions

323F-2 Hawaii health systems corporation

323F-3 Corporation board

323F-3.5 Regional system boards

323F-4 Board meetings

323F-4.5 Captive insurance board

323F-5 Disclosure of interests

323F-5.5 Criminal history record checks

323F-6 Records

323F-7 Duties and powers of the corporation and
regional

system boards

323F-7.5 Regional system boards; delegated authority

323F-7.6 Transition of Hawaii health systems
regional system

or health facility to a new entity

323F-8 Chief executive officer; exempt positions

323F-8.5 Regional chief executive officer; exempt
position

323F-9 Hiring of attorneys

323F-10 Regional public health facility
management advisory

committees

323F-10.5 Executive public health facility
management advisory

committee; establishment

323F-10.6 Peer review and credentialing

323F-11 Executive branch; noninterference

323F-12 Public-private partnership

Part II. Budget and Finance

323F-21 Fiscal provisions

323F-22 Annual audit and report; disclosure of
revenue

projections; internal performance audit

323F-23 Exemption from taxation

323F-24 Budget oversight

323F-25 Regional system board; community
hospitals;

community health centers; collaboration

Part III. Other Provisions

323F-31 Maintenance of services

323F-32 Acquisition of Kahuku hospital

323F-33 Hawaii Medical Center-East; affiliation;

acquisition

323F-34 Tobacco and electronic smoking devices
use

prohibited

Part IV. Public-Private Partnerships for
the Delivery

of Health Care Services at Maui
Regional

System Facilities

323F-51 Definitions

323F-52 Transfer of right and responsibility to
manage,

operate, and provide health care services
in a

facility of the Maui regional system to a

nonprofit management entity

323F-53 Approvals required

323F-54 Real property; terms and conditions

323F-55 Transfer or assignment of other business
assets

323F-56 Liabilities

323F-57 Employment, wages, and benefits

323F-58 Operating support

323F-59 Capital project support

323F-60 Strategic commitment during term of lease

Note

Maui regional system facilities; transfer of health care
services to a nonprofit management entity; governor to inform the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives of transfer completion
dates. L 2015, c 103, §4.

Cross References

Hospital sustainability program, see chapter 346G.

Kahuku medical center; designation as a rural hospital, see
§346-53.8.

Nursing facility sustainability program, see chapter 346F.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next